spellchecker-languagepack-hungarian/dicts/hu_HU.dic
üvöltő/CDHWRMXY
ütköztető/CDHWRMXY
ürítgethető/CDHWRMX
ültethető/CDHWRMX
ügynökösködő/CDHWRMXY
üdíttethető/CDHWRMX
útépítő/CWMRymYcD
ötöltethető/CDHWRMX
ösztökéltethető/CDHWRMX
összegződött/CDHRWX
örökítő/CDHWRMXY
öregbíttető/CDHWRMXY
öntözgettethető/CDHWRMX
önfejű/CWMRymYcDCDHWRM
öltöztető/CDHWRMXY
ölelhető/CDHWRMX
öklöztethető/CDHWRMX
öblösíttető/CDHWRMXY
őröltető/CDHWRMXY
őrizgetendő/CDHWRMX
ízesítő/CWMRymYcDCDHWRMXY
ígérkeztető/CDHWRMXY
észrevételeztető/CDHWRMXY
érződhető/CDHWRMX
érzelmeskedendő/CDHWRMX
értéktelenítendő/CDHWRMX
értesítő/CWMRmYcDCDHWRMXY
érlelendő/CDHWRMX
éretlenkedtethető/CDHWRMX
érdeklő/CDHWRMCDHMWXRY
énekelgető/CDHWRMXY
élveztető/CDHWRMXY
életösztön/CWMymTYcD
éledő/CDHWRMXY
ékeztető/CDHWRMXY
égővörös/CWMmTYcD
ébresztetendő/CDHWRMX
áttetsző/CWMRmYcDCDHWRM
átengedő/CWMRmYcD
állatszakértő/CWMRymYcD
Ölyvös/CWMT
zümmögő/CWMRmYcDCDHWRMXY
zörömböltető/CDHWRMXY
zördíthető/CDHWRMX
zökkentetendő/CDHWRMX
zsörtölődött/CDHRWX
zsindelyezendő/CDHWRMX
zizzenő/CDHWRMXY
vörösödő/CDHWRMXY
vízszintező/CWMRymYcDCDHWRMXY
víkendeztethető/CDHWRMX
vésetendő/CDHWRMX
vénülő/CDHWRMXY
vékonypénzű/CWMRmYcD
véghezvihető/CDHWRMXY
vándorkő/CWYc
vizesítendő/CDHWRMX
visszaélő/CWMRymYcDCDHWRMY
villanyrendőr/CWMymTYcD
vezényeltető/CDHWRMXY
vetíttető/CDHWRMXY
veteményező/CDHWRMXY
vesztegettethető/CDHWRMX
verítékező/CDHWRMXY
vermeltethető/CDHWRMX
vendégszerető/CDHWRM
vegyíthető/CDHWRMX
vasgyűrű/CWMRymYcD
tüszköltető/CDHWRMXY
tündökölt/CDHRWX
tűzögethető/CDHWRMX
tötyörésző/CDHWRMXYCDHWRM
törvényesíttethető/CDHWRMX
töppesztethető/CDHWRMX
tömető/CDHWRMXY
többszöröztethető/CDHWRMX
térítő/CWMRmYcDCDHWRMXY
ténylegesítő/CDHWRMXY
továbbélhető/CDHWRM
tetézhető/CDHWRMX
terültethető/CDHWRMX
termelődő/CDHWRMXY
terelgetendő/CDHWRMX
telítő/CDHWRMXY
tekerőzhető/CDHWRMX
tagdíjfizető/CDHWRM
sültethető/CDHWRMX
sötétedő/CDHWRMXY
sérelmező/CDHWRMXY
szükségelhető/CDHWRMX
szöszölt/CDHRWX
szögeztethető/CDHWRMX
színtelenedő/CDHWRMXY
szélesítendő/CDHWRMX
száműzhető/CDHWRMX
szigetelő/CWMRmYcDCDHWRMXY
szeretkező/CDHWRMXY
szentségtelenítő/CDHWRMXY
szeméremsértő/CDHWRM
szemcsézhető/CDHWRMX
szeldelő/CDHWRMXY
szegdelő/CDHWRMXY
stírölendő/CDHWRMX
sorköz/CWMymTYcD
sikerültethető/CDHWRMX
seprő/CDHMWXRY
sekélyesítendő/CDHWRMX
sarokmérő/CWMRymYcD
röptettethető/CDHWRMX
révülő/CDHWRMXY
rémülő/CDHWRMXY
rubintkő/CWYc
rezdülő/CDHWRMXY
restelkedő/CDHWRMXY
rendező/CWMRmYcDCDHWRMXY
rejtjeleztető/CDHWRMXY
rebegő/CDHWRMXY
pörösködhető/CDHWRMX
pöfékelő/CDHWRMXY
pántlikafű/CWYcCWMRmYcD
pitykéző/CDHWRMXY
pikkeltető/CDHWRMXY
perzseltető/CDHWRMXY
pengettető/CDHWRMXY
pecsételhető/CDHWRMX
okszerűsíthető/CDHWRMX
nő/XCWMRmYcD
négyszögű/CWMRymYcDCDHWRM
nyöszörögött/CDHRWX
nyelvgyötrő/CWMRmYcD
nevesítendő/CDHWRMX
neheztelendő/CDHWRMX
nagylátószögű/CDHWRM
műbőr/CWMymRTYcD
mérgesítő/CDHWRMXY
mélyeszthető/CDHWRMX
mezteleníttető/CDHWRMXY
merényelhető/CDHWRMX
mentegettethető/CDHWRMX
melleszthető/CDHWRMX
megteremtődő/CDHWRMXY
megkatéterező/CDHWRMXY
megbuliztető/CDHWRMXY
lúdbőrztető/CDHWRMXY
lőporserpenyő/CWMRymYcD
lépcsőző/CDHWRMXY
lávakő/CWYc
licencelhető/CDHWRMX
letörülhető/CDHWRMX
lengető/CDHWRMXY
leledztető/CDHWRMXY
legelő/CWMRmYcDCDHWRMXY
lebzseltethető/CDHWRMX
különcködött/CDHRWX
közéelegyíttető/CDHWRMXY
következő/CWMRmYcDCDHWRMXY
kötvényeztethető/CDHWRMX
körző/CWMRmYcDCDHMWXRY
köpcösödött/CDHRWX
kölykezhető/CDHWRMX
köcsögösködhető/CDHWRMX
kézbesíttető/CDHWRMXY
készülhető/CDHWRMX
kérleltető/CDHWRMXY
képzeltethető/CDHWRMX
kényszeríttető/CDHWRMXY
kégliztető/CDHWRMXY
krikettező/CDHWRMXY
kiérő/CDHWRMY
kisstílű/CWMRmYcD
kileveledző/CDHWRMXY
kifedendő/CDHWRMXCDHMWR
kibiceltethető/CDHWRMX
keveredő/CDHWRMXY
kerítő/CWMRmYcDCDHWRMXY
kereszteztethető/CDHWRMX
kenegethető/CDHWRMX
keltegettethető/CDHWRMX
kedvezhető/CDHWRMX
kakilhető/CDHWRMX
jégmező/CWMRymYcD
jelentgető/CDHWRMXY
istenítő/CDHWRMXY
intézhető/CDHWRMX
illegő/CDHWRMXY
időztethető/CDHWRMX
hülyítő/CDHWRMXYCDHWRM
hörgő/CDHMWXRY
hívő/CWMRmYcDCDHWRMXY
háromkerekű/CWMRymYcDCDHWRM
hintő/CDHWRMXY
hessegettethető/CDHWRMX
hemzsegendő/CDHWRMX
hegyű/CDHWRM
haszonleső/CWMRymYcDCDHWRM
hajtű/CWMRymYcD
görgettető/CDHWRMXY
gönc/CWMmTYcD
gógyizhető/CDHWRMX
gyűrű/CWMRmYcD
gyöngülő/CDHWRMXY
gyógyszereltető/CDHWRMXY
gyengélltethető/CDHWRMX
gerebenelő/CDHWRMXY
füröszthető/CDHWRMX
függetlenítendő/CDHWRMX
fölöző/CDHWRMXY
födendő/CDHWRMX
fényvető/CWMRymYcD
félhető/CDHWRMX
forróvérű/CDHWRM
figyelmeztethető/CDHWRMX
feslődhető/CDHWRMX
fenetendő/CDHWRMX
fellegesedtető/CDHWRMXY
felező/CWMRmYcDCDHWRMXY
feküdött/CDHRWX
fejező/CDHWRMXY
feddendő/CDHWRMX
evőeszköz/CWMymTYcD
esküdöző/CDHWRMXY
erődítő/CDHWRMXY
eredményeztető/CDHWRMXY
engesztelődött/CDHRWX
emelő/CWMRmYcDCDHWRMXY
előlegezhető/CDHWRMX
elviselődtető/CDHWRMXY
elnököltető/CDHWRMXY
ellenezendő/CDHWRMX
elfecserésztető/CDHWRMXY
elcsenevészesedő/CDHWRMXY
egyszerűsödő/CDHWRMXY
egyenetlenkedő/CDHWRMXY
dünnyögtethető/CDHWRMX
dörzsölt/CDHRWXBDGVNMR
döngettethető/CDHWRMX
döcögtettető/CDHWRMXY
dzsesszesíttető/CDHWRMXY
dezertőr/CWMmRYcD
címermező/CWMRymYcD
csúszóérintkezős/CWMymTYcD
csöpögő/CWMRmYcDCDHWRMXY
csődültethető/CDHWRMX
csiviteltethető/CDHWRMX
csicsergő/CDHMWXRY
csereztető/CDHWRMXY
csengetendő/CDHWRMX
csekélyelltethető/CDHWRMX
ciciző/CDHWRMXY
bükk/CWMmRYcD
bömböltető/CDHWRMXY
bőszítendő/CDHWRMX
bélyegeztethető/CDHWRMX
bridzselő/CDHWRMXY
billegtetendő/CDHWRMX
betegeskedő/CDHWRMXY
beleértődött/CDHRWX
bekakilhető/CDHWRMX
becsült/CDHRWX
babérfűz/CWYcCWMmTYcD
aljú/WDF
Vöckönd/CWMR
Tiszaszőllős/CWMT
Sztrigyszentgyörgy/CWMT
Pusztamező/CWMR
Nagygörbő/CWMR
Küllő/CWMR
Kisfajkürt/CWMR
Iklándivölgy/CWMT
Gödrös/CWMT
Ferencvölgy/CWMT
Elyüs/CWMT
Cseterőc/CWMT
Buzásbesenyő/CWMR
Assakürt/CWMR
